Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 5. Warnings, Notices, Sample Ballots, and Other Voter Information

§ 2521.
Warnings and notices.

Not less than 30 days before the election, the town clerk shall cause a warning and notice to be posted informing the voters of the town about the election.

The warning shall include the date and time of the election, location of the polling place or places, nature of the election, and offices or questions to be voted upon.

The notice shall contain information on voter registration and early or absentee voting, on how to obtain ballots, mark them, get help marking them, and obtain new ballots if an error is made; information about offenses relating to elections; instructions on how to get help if there is a problem on election day; instructions for registrants by mail; instructions for first-time voters; instructions on who may cast a provisional ballot; instructions on how to cast a provisional ballot; information on federal and State laws prohibiting fraud and misrepresentation; instructions on how to contact the appropriate official if a person believes any of his or her rights to vote have been violated; and other appropriate information.

The warning and notice shall be posted in at least two public places within each town and in or near the town clerk’s office. If a town has more than one polling place, the warning and notice shall be posted in at least two public places within each voting district and in or near the town clerk’s office.

The checklist shall also be posted as required in section 2141 of this title.

The Secretary of State shall prepare forms for the warning and notice and shall furnish each town clerk with at least five copies of the forms for each polling place in the town at least five days before they must be posted. Information required in the warnings and notices that varies from town to town shall be left blank by the Secretary of State and filled in by the town clerk.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 61;

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

1989, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2001, No. 6

, § 12(c), eff. April 10, 2001;

2003, No. 59

, § 25;

2017, No. 50

, § 25.

§ 2522.
Sample ballots.

As soon as ballots are received by the town clerk, but not later than 20 days prior to any primary or general election or 10 days prior to any municipal election, the town clerk shall post sample ballots in at least two public places within the town and in or near the town clerk’s office. If a town has more than one polling place and the polling places are not all in the same building, the sample ballot shall be posted in at least two public places within each voting district and in or near the town clerk’s office.

The town clerk shall prepare the sample ballots by marking the words SAMPLE BALLOT prominently at the top of official election ballots.

[Repealed.]

Upon the request of any high school or other educational institution in the town, the town clerk shall deliver a sample ballot to the high school or educational institution.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 62;

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2003, No. 59

, § 26.

§ 2523.
Posting at polling place on election day.

Before the polls open on election day, the presiding officer shall post copies of the warning and notice and the sample ballots conspicuously in and about the polling place so that voters can reasonably be expected to see them before voting.

The presiding officer shall ensure that signs are placed on or near the ballot boxes informing voters of procedures for depositing ballots. The Secretary of State shall supply the signs.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 63;

2003, No. 59

, § 27.